Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5944.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 109y. (1) The department shall provide coverage under the
medical assistance program to an eligible individual for behavioral
health transport.
(2) The department shall require a behavioral health transport
agency to comply with section 987 of the mental health code, 1974
PA 258, MCL 330.1987. The department shall reimburse a behavioral
health transport agency for providing behavioral transport to an
eligible individual only if the behavioral health transport is
ordered or certified by a licensed provider.
OOH H04157'25 (H-1) ma093d


(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Behavioral health transport" means that term as defined
in section 981 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL
330.1981.
(b) "Behavioral health transport agency" means the owner or
operator of a behavioral health transport.
(c) "Eligible individual" means that term as defined in
section 981 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1981.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless Senate Bill No. 928 or House Bill No. 5943 of the 103rd
Legislature is enacted into law.
Final Page
OOH H04157'25 (H-1) ma093d